lexd/lez_adj.lexd
PATTERN Adjective
AdjStem [<adj>:] [>] AdjNumber [<abs>:]
AdjStem [<adj>:] [>] AdjObl [<erg>:]
AdjStem [<adj>:] [>] AdjObl [>] (Case | (InflEssive ( [<essive>:] | ([>] (Directive | Elative)))))
AdjStem [<adj>:] [>] AdjObl [>] InLocalization ([<essive>:] | ([>] Elative))
AdjStem [<adj>:]

LEXICON AdjNumber
<sg>:ди
<pl>:бур

LEXICON AdjObl
<sg>:да
<pl>:буру
